Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of the Oregon Vehicle
Code.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Drive test” means a test that requires an actual demonstration of driving ability.
(b) “Rural Oregon”  means Baker, Clatsop, Crook, Curry, Gilliam, Grant, Harney, Hood
River, Jefferson, Klamath, Lake, Malheur,  Morrow, Sherman, Tillamook, Umatilla, Union,
Wallowa, Wasco and Wheeler Counties.
(2) At field  offices of the Department of Transportation located in rural counties, from
among the applicants who request a drive test in rural Oregon, the department shall  prior-
itize requests from applicants whose residence address is located:
(a) In the same county as the field office;
(b) Within 50 miles of the field office; or
(c) In a county that does not have a field office.
Enrolled Senate Bill 9 (SB 9-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate May 6, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 9 (SB 9-A) Page 2